



































Decentralized Manufacturing 
Creating the world’s first peer-to-peer manufacturing 
supply chain and incentivized token system adapted for 
public and private blockchains 

V16 - February 15, 2018 

“The best way to predict the future is to create it.” 

- Peter Drucker, Next Generation Manufacturing



 

 

Table of Contents 

Regulatory Strategy 5 

Abstract 5 

1.0 Industrial Revolution 4.0: Where Manufacturing Technology Meets Global Demand 6 

1.1 SyncFab’s Contribution to the Industrial Revolution 4.0 7 

2.0 Braving the Burdens of Today’s Manufacturing Processes 11 

2.1 High costs related to procurement brokers and agents when sourcing materials 12 

2.2 High minimums for production because of time spent on finding the right                         
manufacturing suppliers. Data regarding: performance track record, quality, and size of                     
contracts between purchasers and manufacturers remain in silos. 12 

2.3 Difficulty seeing manufacturer capacities and capabilities to achieve economies of                     
scale within the supply chain 13 

2.4 Difficulty tracking progress along the supply chain (when purchasers and                     
manufacturers confront delays, or need to resolve problems in real-time throughout                     
the production process) 14 

2.5 Loss in labor-hours to inefficient procurement processes 14 

2.6 Security concerns about protection of intellectual property 15 

3.0 SyncFab’s Pathways  to Decentralized Manufacturing 16 

3.1 Re-shaping supply chain management through a public, direct peer-to-peer (P2P)                     
manufacturing ecosystem 16 

3.2 Incentivizing Change in Supply Chain Management 17 

3.3 Smart Manufacturing Blockchain 18 

3.4 Smart Contracts for Transparent Procurement Processing 20 

3.5 Smart Business Model for Decentralized Supply Chain Management 20 

4.0 MFG Utility Token: Incentivizing Blockchain Buy-in 22 

4.1 Incentivizing the Manufacturer (Bidder) 22 

4.2 Workflow for Purchaser Bids on Smart Manufacturing Blockchain 24 

4.2.1 Tiered-Rewards for Bids 24 

 

2/64 



 

4.3 Incentivizing the Purchasers 25 

4.4 Workflow and Distribution for Manufacturers 26 

4.5 Transaction Fee 26 

4.6 More Potential Uses for MFG Tokens (Future Builds) 27 

4.7 MFG Economic Model 27 

4.8 Loyalty Pool (Transaction Turnover) 27 

5.0 Technical Overview 29 

5.1 SyncFab Platform Web 2.0 29 

5.2 Example of Parts Procurement Workflow Using SyncFab 2.0 30 

5.3 SyncFab Platform Web 3.0 and the DApp (Decentralized Application): Smart                     
Contracts and Smart Manufacturing Blockchain (Planned Build-Out) 32 

5.3.1 Identity Contract 33 

5.3.2 Purchase Order Contract 33 

5.3.3 Payment Contract 33 

5.3.4 Account Contracts 33 

5.3.5 Insurance Contract 34 

5.3.6 Production Contract 34 

5.4 Example of Smart Contracts Procurement Transaction Workflow 34 

5.5 More Streamlining of Procurement and Transaction within SyncFab Features 36 

5.6 Example of Decentralized Procurement Transaction Workflow 37 

5.7 Premium Features Planned for Future SyncFab DApp (Future Build-Outs) 38 

5.7.1 Application Program Interface (API) 38 

5.7.2 Machine Data Feed 38 

5.7.3 Public Data Feed 39 

5.7.4 Connection to Logistics Providers 39 

6.0 Competitive Analysis 40 

7.0 Roadmap 42 

7.1 Milestones 42 

 

3/64 



 

7.2 Funding Roadmap 44 

8.0 MFG Token Distribution Launch 45 

8.1 Token Distribution Event 45 

8.2 Bonus Incentives 46 

8.2.1 Industrial Revolutionary Private Presale 46 

8.2.2 Hardware Innovators Exclusive Presale 46 

8.2.3 Public Presale 46 

8.2.4 Main Public Sale 46 

8.3 Token Distribution Plan 47 

8.4 Strategic Partnership Adoption Pool 49 

8.5 Funding Breakdown 49 

8.6 MFG Token Distribution Smart Contract 51 

8.7 Reference: Ethereum Smart Contract Standard 51 

9.0 Risk Factors 52 

10.0 Team 54 

10.1 Smart MFG Tech LTD 54 

10.2 SyncFab Team 55 

10.3 Advisory Board 59 

11.0 Changelog - White Paper Versions & Edits 64 

 

   

 

4/64 



 

 

Regulatory Strategy 

The team behind the MFG is currently working with legal counsel to ensure that the MFG                               

Token Distribution Event is fully compliant with all applicable federal and state securities laws.  

 

 

Abstract 

Through public-private partnerships with manufacturers at the local, regional and                   

national levels, SyncFab’s Smart Manufacturing Blockchain will advance efforts to                   

decentralize manufacturing via a public, peer-to-peer ecosystem, powered by the                   

MFG Utility Token. 

This document examines current burdens faced by small to mid-sized enterprises working                       

within the manufacturing supply chain, and provides a comprehensive set of solutions to                         

engage isolated and inaccessible manufacturers, widening their inter-industry networks and                   

encouraging collaboration to meet global production demands.  

By collecting quality data about today’s opaque manufacturing supply chain and making it                         

public, SyncFab’s platform aims to make the supply chain more transparent, efficient, and                         

sustainable. 

The paper highlights the development of SyncFab’s decentralized application, the MFG Utility                       

Token which incentivizes streamlining of bidding and procurement processes, and details the                       

upcoming MFG Utility Token Distribution Event (token sale).  

Blockchain and smart contracts serve as the way forward into the Industrial Revolution 4.0,                           

creating economies of scale and potentially aggregating supply. Decentralized manufacturing                   

will make the industry more accessible, secure and economically sound for more participants                         

in a direct peer-to-peer (P2P) ecosystem. 

 

5/64 



 

This document contains forward-looking statements, subject to risks and uncertainties                   

that could cause actual results to differ materially. 

 

1.0 Industrial Revolution 4.0: Where Manufacturing 

Technology Meets Global Demand 

The United States and China account for more than a third of the world’s gross                             

domestic product (GDP), and their combined GDP dominance is expected to continue                       

into 2050, especially if their industries make the transition to new manufacturing                       

processes. Manufacturing and trade gains signal growth for global economies as a                       

whole, according the International Monetary Fund. According to a study performed by                       

PWC and shared by the World Economic Forum in 2016 - Companies from all sectors                             

across the globe are embracing “Industry 4.0”, or business in the digital age. About one                             

third of 2,000 companies surveyed in 26 countries already rate their level of digitisation                           

as high, and this value is expected to rise on average from 33% to 72% by 2020. In                                   

South Africa, the current level of digitisation and integration is expected to rise from                           

27% to 64% by 2020. 

Forging into the Industrial Revolution 4.0, U.S. manufacturing companies (95% of which                       

are independent, small- to medium-sized shops) must solve issues that currently hinder                       

production, and find ways to aggregate their capacity to handle global demand more                         

efficiently.  

Significant advances in robotics, sensors, big data, artificial intelligence, and augmented                     

reality have connected the digital and physical realms of manufacturing through robust                       

and reliable networks.  

With these technologies, integrated production and purchasing processes operating                 

seamlessly along the supply chain would save time and resources; improve efficiency;                       

and increase scalability and security.  

 

6/64 



 

Demand for services that support this potential global exchange of data, and its                         

transaction of both data and contracts between businesses fuel the expansion of the                         

Internet of Things (IoT) and the Industrial Internet of Things (IIoT). 

 

As an industry leader said:  

“The Internet of Things has already set in motion the idea of a fourth industrial                             

revolution—a new wave of technological changes that will decentralize production                   

control and trigger a paradigm shift in manufacturing.”   
1

1.1 SyncFab’s Contribution to the Industrial Revolution 4.0 

Silicon Valley-based SyncFab aims to harness technologies and connect with the                     

IoT and the IIoT to provide purchasers and manufacturers with high quality data                         

that would streamline processes along the supply chain. 

Connecting purchasers with manufacturers in the IIoT through its                 

business-to-business (B2B) SaaS ecosystem, SyncFab creates a public,               

peer-to-peer ecosystem whereby purchasers can find companies capable of                 

advanced machining of on-demand precision parts production and engage                 

participants passionate about improving efficiencies in the supply chain. While                   

the government built the Internet (ARPANET), SyncFab believes the IIoT will be                       

built collaboratively, through public-private partnerships (of which SyncFab has                 

formed). Such cross-sector partnerships will collect and combine best practices                   

and share wisdom from multiple perspectives. 

Inventors, innovators, and designers enter an interactive, cloud-based portal                 

where a growing network of certified machine shops and advanced                   

1 "The Internet of Things and the future of manufacturing | McKinsey ...." 
http://www.mckinsey.com/business-functions/digital-mckinsey/our-insights/the-internet-of-things-and-th
e-future-of-manufacturing​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

7/64 

http://www.mckinsey.com/business-functions/digital-mckinsey/our-insights/the-internet-of-things-and-the-future-of-manufacturing
http://www.mckinsey.com/business-functions/digital-mckinsey/our-insights/the-internet-of-things-and-the-future-of-manufacturing


 

manufacturing facilities are mapped by several criteria, such as, who is local and                         

clean.  
2

With SyncFab’s curated and adaptive services, companies attempting to shift                   

their manufacturing processes to high-tech smart factories, and those exploring                   

ways to optimize their “cost-to-serve” process (lowering overhead costs per                   

customer account) can find solutions such as sourcing, tracking and organizing                     

precision parts production and improved procurement systems.  

A recent report found that U.S. companies spent an estimated $20 billion in                         

2012, and are forecasted to spend approximately $500 billion by 2020 on smart                         

technologies.   
3

In the 2016 Forbes’ Manufacturer Outlook, 32% of companies surveyed said                     

their corporate strategy largely relies on integrated technologies via the IIoT. See                       

Chart: Putting Technology in the Supply Chain.   
4

These forward-looking companies are the customer base for SyncFab’s services.  

Essential to SyncFab’s Smart Manufacturing Blockchain will be the use of the                       

MFG Utility Token, a first of its kind to incentivize community users to embrace                           

blockchain technology. Core to the blockchain’s adoption is a shared sense of                       

trust between purchasers, developers and manufacturers built on a public and                     

more transparent supply chain system, where small to medium-sized                 

manufacturers can access a blockchain and be a supplier in spaces where they                         

are currently obscured.   

For example, to compensate for work done on RFQs creates more responses to                         

the just-in-time needs of supply chain purchasers and buyers. Purchase                   

2 "ISO 50001 Energy Management Standard | Department of Energy." ​https://energy.gov/ISO50001​. 
Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
3 "Defining And Sizing The Industrial Internet - Wikibon."27 Jun. 2013, 
http://wikibon.org/wiki/v/Defining_and_Sizing_the_Industrial_Internet​. Accessed 10 Sep. 2017. 
4 "Global Manufacturing Outlook - KPMG." 
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-g
rowth.pdf​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

8/64 

https://energy.gov/ISO50001
http://wikibon.org/wiki/v/Defining_and_Sizing_the_Industrial_Internet
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf


 

managers cut through trust issues and delays with blockchain’s inherent                   

transparency into cost and quality control.  

With the MFG Token’s launch, SyncFab serves as an early adopter, protocol                       

developer and integrator of Smart Contracts into the manufacturing supply                   

chain blockchain. The MFG Token will be utilized firstly on SyncFab, secondly on                         

SyncFab's soon to be developed Smart Manufacturing Smart Contract Ethereum                   

Blockchain and ultimately adopted by new and emerging partner manufacturing                   

supply chain blockchains using SyncFab's developed blockchain smart contract                 

protocols or their own with the industry's first MFG Token Smart Contract-based                       

incentive mechanism. 

The MFG Token will be integrated on the SyncFab platform which has a strong                           

network launchpad built out from public-private partnerships. Though it’s                 

designed to serve a public, peer-to-peer Smart Manufacturing Blockchain, it’s                   

utility is designed to be complementary to third party standalone solutions, such                       

as those future supply chain blockchains which are more inward-looking, private                     

enterprise based supply chain blockchains. 

 

9/64 



 

 

Figure​ ​1: Putting Technology to work in the supply chain.  5

The shift in business strategy within the revolution is driven by companies and                         

manufacturers alike to streamline an efficient procurement and production                 

process to reduce overhead costs and increase revenue. 

 

5 "Global Manufacturing Outlook - KPMG." 
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-g
rowth.pdf​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

10/64 

https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf


 

2.0 Braving the Burdens of Today’s Manufacturing 

Processes 

Industrial manufacturing in the U.S. steadily rose, with growth forecasted at 5%                       

compounded annually into 2018. In 2014, an estimated $1.4 trillion in exported goods                       
6

were made in the United States.  
7

 

Figure 2: Manufacturing Production Growth Projection 

Yet major manufacturing companies still face inefficiencies that drain resources and                     

time, and contribute to the overall slowness and costliness within their manufacturing                       

process.  

U.S. companies investing heavily in IIoT technologies stand to gain yields from global                         

demand as high as $10-$15 trillion by 2030, according to an Accenture Technology                         

report. Investments in such technology are limited to large conglomerates, while the                       
8

vast majority of independent, small- to medium-sized companies still face well-known                     

burdens within the manufacturing process, such as: 

6 "Manufacturing & Distribution Industry Forecast | Sikich." 
http://www.sikich.com/find-solution/industries/manufacturing-distribution/manufacturing-forecast​. 
Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
7 "Industry 4.0 and manufacturing ecosystems: Exploring the world of." 22 Feb. 2016, 
https://dupress.deloitte.com/dup-us-en/focus/industry-4-0/manufacturing-ecosystems-exploring-world-c
onnected-enterprises.html​. Accessed 10 Sep. 2017. 
8 "Defining And Sizing The Industrial Internet - Wikibon."27 Jun. 2013, 
http://wikibon.org/wiki/v/Defining_and_Sizing_the_Industrial_Internet​. Accessed 10 Sep. 2017. 
 

11/64 

http://www.sikich.com/find-solution/industries/manufacturing-distribution/manufacturing-forecast
https://dupress.deloitte.com/dup-us-en/focus/industry-4-0/manufacturing-ecosystems-exploring-world-connected-enterprises.html
https://dupress.deloitte.com/dup-us-en/focus/industry-4-0/manufacturing-ecosystems-exploring-world-connected-enterprises.html
http://wikibon.org/wiki/v/Defining_and_Sizing_the_Industrial_Internet


 

2.1 High costs related to procurement brokers and agents when                   
sourcing materials 

To source parts, companies hire an internal procurement manager (or rely on                       

externally-contracted brokers or agents) to search for and order parts.                   

Companies compensate for procurement salaries and commission bonuses,               

paying brokers “finder’s fees” or taking a markup fee on top of the                         

manufacturer’s quoted price – which affect overhead costs that lower overall                     

revenue. SyncFab’s Procurement Platform 2.0 supplants the need for brokers,                   

or cuts time spent by Supply Chain Purchase Account Managers on putting out                         

bids. SyncFab’s all-in-one platform matches purchasers’ RFQs to potential                 

manufacturers. Through Smart Contracts, Sync Fab’s 3.0 platform will match up                     

the requirements to supplier capabilities intuitively and unlock contract values                   

as conditions are fulfilled. 

2.2 High minimums for production because of time spent on finding                     
the right manufacturing suppliers. Data regarding: performance             
track record, quality, and size of contracts between purchasers and                   
manufacturers remain in silos. 

In a survey conducted by Deltabid, 31% out of 500 purchasers said finding the                           

right supplier remains a major obstacle. A contributing factor is the risk                       
9

manufacturers face when dealing with unknown and non-transparent               

purchasers’ profiles and their buying histories. Manufacturers want to ensure                   

their orders are paid on time while purchasers are confronted with delays when                         

unsure if a manufacturer can produce their product within specification needs.                     

Without a broker’s reputation and network, purchasers spend hours on the                     

phone or search through multiple directories. Sometimes, purchasers lack the                   

sufficient technical understanding of the product to specify their search                   

requirements, leading to dead-end outreach. On the purchasers’ side, they                   
10

want proof of experience and expertise from manufacturers to safeguard the                     

9 "Top 10 Biggest Procurement Challenges [Infographic] - DeltaBid Blog." 19 Apr. 2016, 
http://blog.deltabid.com/top-10-biggest-procurement-challenges​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2 
10 "Managing Suppliers Up to Speed - Harvard Business Review." 
https://hbr.org/1989/07/managing-suppliers-up-to-speed​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

12/64 

http://blog.deltabid.com/top-10-biggest-procurement-challenges
https://hbr.org/1989/07/managing-suppliers-up-to-speed


 

integrity and quality of their product. Negotiating the complexity of these needs                       

results in high minimums, a required minimum number of parts produced.                     

SyncFab’s mapping feature allows for local sourcing, which lowers minimums,                   

especially when procured through trusted channels. By aggregating demand                 

and creating economies of scale, SyncFab’s access to manufacturing capacities                   

creates access to markets in ways that would revolutionize how small to                       

medium-sized manufacturing businesses meet supply chain demand. 

2.3 Difficulty seeing manufacturer capacities and capabilities to               
achieve economies of scale within the supply chain 

Purchasers and manufacturers both suffer from a lack of data and high-quality                       

information into the sourcing and production process of their supply chain. An                       

astounding 39% of companies and individuals surveyed (See graph on Figure 2:                       

“Lacking Visibility”) state they aren’t clear about the supply and capacity of their                         

suppliers and logistic partners; 38% cite “some visibility,” accounting for a total of                         

77% of those surveyed. With SyncFab products, purchasers and manufacturers                   

can manage cross-functionality and look deeper into the end-to-end supply                   

chain, enabling better real-time decisions to optimize and streamline their                   

procurement and supply chain process.  

 

 

13/64 



 

Figure 3: Lacking Visibility Into Supply and Capacity  11

Visibility into the supply chain would allow purchasers and manufacturers to                     

manage cross-functionality and look deeper into the end-to-end supply chain,                   

enabling better real-time decisions to optimize and streamline their                 

procurement and supply chain process.  

2.4 Difficulty tracking progress along the supply chain (when                 
purchasers and manufacturers confront delays, or need to resolve                 
problems in real-time throughout the production process) 

Manufacturing is driven by details and specifications, making clear and precise                     

communication vital between purchasers, manufacturers, suppliers and             

logistical partners along the supply chain. Miscommunication can lead to delays                     

within the production process, drastically increasing costs when mistakes                 

happen. A delay in communicating changes in design requirements between the                     

procurement department and engineering department could increase the               

design to production time. Purchasers and manufacturers often forget to                   

regularly communicate updates in production or material requirements,               

increasing lead time and increasing product cost or affecting product quality.                   

SyncFab’s automatic updates on production progress and tracking will be an                     

evolving feature, which would replace the need for constant phone calls or                       

status request updates between purchasers and manufacturers as automation                 

would streamline communications.  

2.5 Loss in labor-hours to inefficient procurement processes  

According to research by The Topline Strategy Group, inefficient procurement                   

processes account for a yearly loss of $1.5 billion in revenue among North                         

American businesses. Most companies currently have little to no procurement                   
12

11 "Global Manufacturing Outlook - KPMG." 
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-g
rowth.pdf​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
12 "PLANNING FOR INNOVATION - U.S.-China Economic and Security ...." 18 Sep. 2015, 
https://www.uscc.gov/sites/default/files/Research/Planning%20for%20Innovation-Understanding%20Chi
na%27s%20Plans%20for%20Tech%20Energy%20Industrial%20and%20Defense%20Development07281
6.pdf​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

14/64 

https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf
https://home.kpmg.com/content/dam/kpmg/pdf/2016/05/global-manufacturing-outlook-competing-for-growth.pdf
https://www.uscc.gov/sites/default/files/Research/Planning%20for%20Innovation-Understanding%20China%27s%20Plans%20for%20Tech%20Energy%20Industrial%20and%20Defense%20Development072816.pdf
https://www.uscc.gov/sites/default/files/Research/Planning%20for%20Innovation-Understanding%20China%27s%20Plans%20for%20Tech%20Energy%20Industrial%20and%20Defense%20Development072816.pdf
https://www.uscc.gov/sites/default/files/Research/Planning%20for%20Innovation-Understanding%20China%27s%20Plans%20for%20Tech%20Energy%20Industrial%20and%20Defense%20Development072816.pdf


 

software, while larger companies mainly use in-house, company-specific               

software that can be slow and difficult to use across the supply chain. The                           

resources required to manage and maintain such software account for $32                     

million in labor-hours, all of which can be reallocated to finding more cost-saving                         

technology and providing hands-on value to existing and prospective                 

customers. SyncFab’s frontend and backend software updates in real time, a                     

benefit that reduces the financial burden of maintaining locally-hosted software.                   

Purchasers can share files, improve communications, streamline procurement               

and manage parts inventory helping them hone in on creating quality products. 

2.6 Security concerns about protection of intellectual property 

Security concerns over intellectual property remain a scrutinized topic within the                     

industry. In “Cyber Risk in Advanced Manufacturing,” a study done by Deloitte,                       

only 52% of executives surveyed felt confident or extremely confident their                     

organization’s assets were protected from external threats. Some 48% felt                   

somewhat confident or less confident. Of all those surveyed, 36% cited                     

protection of intellectual property as a top concern. How can new technologies                       
13

create some added security for manufacturers and purchasers who want to                     

protect their ideas? Remaining competitive requires deep financial and time                   

commitments, a luxury reserved for bigger, more established companies who                   

can afford cybersecurity staff. For secured transactions, SyncFab’s platform                 

stores intellectual property, forms, and documents in Amazon Web Services                   

(AWS) servers backed by top security protocols such as SSO, firewall and DDoS                         

protection. All RFQs, IP, and transactional history are easily accessed in real time                         

to help users compare pricing or past requirements to speed up the                       

procurement process.  

 

 

   

13 "Cyber risk in advanced manufacturing | Deloitte US." 
https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/manufacturing/articles/cyber-risk-in-advanced-manufacturing.ht
ml​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

15/64 

https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/manufacturing/articles/cyber-risk-in-advanced-manufacturing.html
https://www2.deloitte.com/us/en/pages/manufacturing/articles/cyber-risk-in-advanced-manufacturing.html


 

 

3.0 SyncFab’s Pathways  to Decentralized 

Manufacturing 

Given the burdens of current manufacturing systems which perpetuate lack of                     

transparency and inaccessibility for a multitude of stakeholders within the supply chain,                       

SyncFab’s solutions attempt to solve complex problems with five key innovations. 

3.1 Re-shaping supply chain management through a public, direct                 
peer-to-peer (P2P) manufacturing ecosystem 

Traditional manufacturing economies of scale perpetuate a lack of transparency                   

and inaccessibility, reserving privileged access to centralized assets controllers. 

The largest purchasers, often conglomerates, monopolize access. Brokers               

control networks and procurement by keeping information in silos, complicating                   

the entire supply chain management process. 

A public, peer-to-peer (P2P) ecosystem, paves the way to an entirely                     

decentralized supply chain management environment. Innovators, suppliers,             

and manufacturers regain control over the success, quality, and delivery of their                       

product.  

With Smart Contracts and the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain, decentralizing                 

the manufacturing supply chain economies of scale, makes the entire system                     

more accessible, transparent and profitable to all participants, and replaces a                     

predominantly exclusive business-to-business model. SyncFab’s public-private           

partnerships, and expansion of local ecosystems builds trust among                 

stakeholders in the supply chain based on shared knowledge of track-record                     

performance, capabilities and capacities in ways that would transform the                   

manufacturing industry. 

 

16/64 



 

Agreements with the City of San Leandro and the Clean Energy Smart                       
14

Manufacturing Innovation Institute (jointly funded by the Department of Energy                   

and Department of Commerce as directed by the White House) , give SyncFab                       
15

confidential access to high quality industry manufacturing process data, which                   

will be key to future process optimization using artificial intelligence applications                     

of the future.  

Partnerships with Regional Manufacturing Centers will allow SyncFab to track                   

under-utilized production assets. Through this work and on-going new                 
16

registrations, SyncFab continues to catalogue machining process capabilities               

and capacities within multiple jurisdictions and plans to expand this data                     

collection on a regional, national, even international level. With an expanded                     
17

network of certified manufacturers online, SyncFab’s database offers               

purchasers’ a wide selection to meet regional demand.  

3.2 Incentivizing Change in Supply Chain Management 

The MFG Utility Token plays a vital role of the SyncFab platform in that it creates                               

an online value sharing system within the decentralized manufacturing                 

ecosystem.  

Built on the Ethereum ERC-20 standard, and sold to existing and new SyncFab                         

users, the MFG token will be used by early adopters to pay for order quotes.                             

After the future build, users will be able to unlock and update Smart Contracts                           

and pay transaction fees.  

With the MFG token, in a decentralized system, users dictate the ecosystem’s                       

economy of scale by incentivizing and rewarding its community users.  

14 "SYNCFAB Selected by Cities of San Francisco & San Leandro to STIR ...." 20 Jul. 2016,                                 
http://www.releasewire.com/press-releases/syncfab-selected-by-cities-of-san-francisco-san-leandro-to-st
ir-program-707463.htm​. Accessed 19 Sep. 2017. 
15 "FACT SHEET: President Obama Announces Winner of New Smart ...."                     
https://obamawhitehouse.archives.gov/the-press-office/2016/06/20/fact-sheet-president-obama-annou
nces-winner-new-smart-manufacturing​. Accessed 19 Sep. 2017. 
16 "CESMII." ​https://www.cesmii.org/​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
17 "14 Startups Chosen for San Francisco Regional 'Startup in Residence ...." 19 Apr. 2016,                             
http://www.govtech.com/13-Startups-Chosen-for-San-Francisco-Regional-Startup-in-Residence-Program.
html​. Accessed 19 Sep. 2017. 
 

17/64 

http://www.releasewire.com/press-releases/syncfab-selected-by-cities-of-san-francisco-san-leandro-to-stir-program-707463.htm
http://www.releasewire.com/press-releases/syncfab-selected-by-cities-of-san-francisco-san-leandro-to-stir-program-707463.htm
https://obamawhitehouse.archives.gov/the-press-office/2016/06/20/fact-sheet-president-obama-announces-winner-new-smart-manufacturing
https://obamawhitehouse.archives.gov/the-press-office/2016/06/20/fact-sheet-president-obama-announces-winner-new-smart-manufacturing
https://www.cesmii.org/
http://www.govtech.com/13-Startups-Chosen-for-San-Francisco-Regional-Startup-in-Residence-Program.html
http://www.govtech.com/13-Startups-Chosen-for-San-Francisco-Regional-Startup-in-Residence-Program.html


 

In the current SyncFab Web 2.0 platform, MFG tokens will incentivize                     

manufacturers for traditionally uncompensated time for putting together quotes                 

and make manufacturers more responsive to time-sensitive production               

deadlines. Enticed by a reward for timely quotes, manufacturers are expected to                       

respond more quickly. With such token incentives, the pool of manufacturers a                       

purchaser can choose from might increase and diversify. 

SyncFab’s public-private partnerships, investment into the platform and the MFG                   

Utility Token are built to solve current supply chain trust dilemmas, where                       

purchasers currently don’t know enough about their suppliers to take the risk of                         

placing an order. Many will turn to Smart Manufacturing Blockchain because of                       

its openness to new suppliers, backed by an immutable distributed transaction                     

ledger with cryptographic proofs of the integrity and access to transaction                     

tokens which may well encourage manufacturers to hire a supplier in minutes,                       

whereas previously they could never do so without face-to-face meetings. 

3.3 Smart Manufacturing Blockchain 

Blockchain applications within the IIoT are fast-emerging as the new standard in                       

many sectors, including finance, real estate, food industries and manufacturing.  

Blockchain’s function as a digital ledger of codes containing programmed data                     

and encryption, make records nearly incorruptible within its distribution                 

networks.  

As a shared database, where information is stored, verified and agreed upon                       

simultaneously by the millions of computers within its hosted consensus,                   

blockchains are considered extremely difficult to hack, and create an ideal                     

ecosystem for manufacturing companies concerned with security and               

intellectual property.  

 

18/64 



 

 

Figure 4: Transactions and Recording Contracts Between Blocks on Blockchain  
18

SyncFab’s Smart Manufacturing Blockchain Smart Contract Protocol will utilize                 

blockchain’s system of records to match purchasers with their most ideal                     

manufacturers.  

Comparing various manufacturer’s order histories, machine capacities, and               

previous product designs to a purchaser’s project criteria, the Smart                   

Manufacturing Blockchain will directly link purchasers to manufacturer,               

expediting procurement and production without brokers or banks.  

Completed purchase orders recorded onto the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain                 

will help build a user's service history, providing access to information to others                         

in the network about performance, reliability, and on-time delivery. This online                     

history will afford purchasers and manufacturers confidence that orders placed                   

can and will be fulfilled.   

18 "Blockchain - Wikipedia." ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blockchain​. Accessed 3 Sep. 2017. 
 

19/64 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blockchain


 

By eliminating intermediaries such as brokers, outdated software, and inefficient                   

procurement processes, the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain aims to lower the                   

barrier of entry, and connect innovators to manufacturers, smart machines to                     

factories and create a transparent and decentralized network for supply chain                     

management. 

 

3.4 Smart Contracts for Transparent Procurement Processing 

SyncFab’s Smart Manufacturing Smart Contract Protocol will be pivotal in the                     

standardization of a decentralized supply chain management.  

SyncFab DApp’s Smart Contracts will work on two levels.  

Using SynFab’s future procurement process, Smart Contracts will store RFQs,                   

quotes and encrypted intellectual properties, on the Smart Manufacturing                 

Blockchain, but only allow access to those with allocated rights to track, record                         

and monitor a manufacturers’ assets. In the initial stages of SyncFab’s                     

procurement system the company charges a broker’s fee , but as the system                         

becomes decentralized, and Smart Contracts will be better tailored to                   

purchasers’ and manufacturers’ needs, a fully decentralized ecosystem will                 

emerge and fees adjusted to match services.  

Meanwhile different datasets within the Smart Contract can be accessed by                     

prospective purchasers on the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain. Data regarding                 

purchasers’ and manufacturers’ profiles and their successful production orders                 

will be recorded to the ledger, with each order leaving a digital paper trail of a                               

company’s credibility and performance. 

3.5 Smart Business Model for Decentralized Supply Chain               
Management 

Currently, SyncFab’s platform includes a financial markup applied on top of the                       

final agreement between purchasers and manufacturers — an industry practice                   

for third-party referrers. However, in addition to connecting producers with                   

 

20/64 



 

purchasers, SyncFab now already provides technologies for a faster and                   

streamlined buying process. The markup usually equates to a much smaller                     

quote compared to those received from purchasers without SyncFab.  

SyncFab anticipates that in a decentralized supply chain management network,                   

markup fees will likely be eliminated. Instead transaction cost on all final                       

payments will be a percentage determined during development and after the                     

Smart Contract proof of concept.  

The Smart Contract proof of concept is where SyncFab plans to develop and                         

improve Smart Contracts by adjusting and tailoring contracts to purchasers and                     

manufacturers “real-life” and relevant procurement processes. As more               

companies seek a decentralized ecosystem, SyncFab will apply lessons learned                   

and determine an appropriate fee based on a better understanding of                     

purchasers’ needs and each business’ Smart Contract uses.  

To pilot services, SyncFab collaborates with local cities and federal agencies                     

building public-private partnerships to advance industry innovation and               

economic development.  

   

 

21/64 



 

 

4.0 MFG Utility Token: Incentivizing Blockchain Buy-in 

SyncFab envisions a vibrant ecosystem of purchasers, manufacturers, suppliers and                   

logistics service providers actively buying, selling and ordering manufacturing-related                 

services within the Smart Manufacturing Smart Contract Blockchain. Initially, incentives                   

to join will be in the form of the MFG Utility Token, which give value to tasks those within                                     

the supply chain already do and are not currently compensated for, such as suppliers                           

putting together quotes for purchasers. Incentives work for both purchasers and                     

manufacturers as a way to bring them into the blockchain.  

The MFG Token’s value will shadow the value of relevant workers’ hourly wage in                           

accordance with its intended reward audience. So essentially the value of buying the                         

MFG Token includes:  

● Buying into SyncFab's existing production capacity network 

● Supporting the continued build-out and evolution of SyncFab's smart                 

manufacturing production capacity network  

● Expanding partner network adoption of the MFG, smart manufacturing and smart                     

contract blockchain buildout on SyncFab and in the supply chain industry 

● Incentivizing workers to embrace the technology and be more responsive to                     

buyers requests while compensating them for a critical function for which they are                         

taken for granted - RFQs (Details outlined in Section 3.1) 

4.1 Incentivizing the Manufacturer (Bidder) 

To reduce the time to production and drive competition, SyncFab plans to use                         

MFG Tokens to reward manufacturers who place faster bids and price more                       

competitive (lower-priced) quotes in proportion to their quote acceptance rates. 

Every RFQ created will be listed as an auction, attached with a MFG Token                           

reward to the manufacturers for their bidding efforts. Similar in process to a                         

unique bid auction, the winner usually offers the lowest bid, but also has the                           

 

22/64 



 

skillsets, capabilities and certifications required to successfully complete the                 

work. 

A minimum requirement will be placed on all RFQs listed -- an amount to be                             

determined after the initial token distribution. Rates and values are subject to                       

change upon future user feedback and engagement. The amounts will vary and                       

are dependent on the scope and delivery of the project. Added benefits for                         

using the system, include: 

● Manufacturers earn compensation for their responsiveness to all RFQs                 

including those from small and mid-sized business buyers. 

● Manufacturers see upfront investment by committed purchasers who offer                 

MFG Token bid rewards. 

● Manufacturers can focus on production and spend less time in                   

pre-production communication qualifying walk-in customers. 

● Hard-to-find small to mid-sized businesses and other less accessible shops                   

will more likely make bids, because of the lowered barrier of entry. 

● Manufacturers gain confidence in purchasers who compensate for their                 

effort – whether their bid wins or not. 

● Manufacturers increase engagement on SyncFab or partner networks to                 

search and seek out MFG Token bid rewards. 

● Manufacturers potentially will be able to submit a portion of cost related to                         

incomplete or flawed orders to be partially compensated by tokens.                   

Currently these substantial cost flaws are covered by the manufacturer or                     

their insurance agents in full. 

● Manufacturers who perform exceptionally well receive “tips” from their                 

buyer. 

 

23/64 



 

4.2 Workflow for Purchaser Bids on Smart Manufacturing               
Blockchain 

1. Purchaser creates an RFQ (auction listing). 

2. Purchaser will submit project budget inclusive of a tolerance amount of                     

how much they’re willing to go over budget. The proposed budget will be                         

visible to the manufacturers, while the tolerance amount will not.  

3. Purchaser adds the MFG token bid reward amount. A minimum amount of                       

MFG token bid reward will be determined for all RFQ auctions. 

4. RFQs come in bid packages of three. If the Purchaser wants more bids, they                           

would buy two packages for a total of 6 bids.   

5. RFQ is sent via Smart Manufacturing Blockchain to multiple manufacturers                   

for bidding. 

6. Manufacturers review the RFQ and decide to make a bid.  

7. SyncFab’s system compares bids, automatically rejecting bids above the                 

tolerance amount set by purchaser. Manufacturers will be informed                 

beforehand that any bids exceeding the purchaser’s tolerance will not be                     

included in the three-bid package to the purchaser.  

8. However, manufacturers whose bid amount exceeds the tolerance will be                   

given the option to revise and re-price their bid only once during the                         

bidding process. 

9. The Purchaser selects the winner. 

4.2.1 Tiered-Rewards for Bids 

Once a purchaser selects a winner, a tiered reward for bids takes effect: 

Scenario with three bids or more: 

● 50% of the MFG bid reward will be awarded to winning bidder. 

 

24/64 



 

● 20% of the MFG bid reward will be awarded to each of the two (2) losing                               

bidders, totaling 40%.  

● 10% of the MFG bid reward will be allocated into the Loyalty Pool to                           

incentivize future users for increased engagement. 

Scenario with less than three bids: 

● Purchaser will be refunded 20% for every bid that was not received.  

● If there is only one bid with said bid accepted as the winner, the 50% of                               

reward goes to the winner, 40% is refunded to the purchaser with the                         

remaining 10% allocated to the Loyalty Pool. 

● If there is at least one bid with no winner accepted, 20% will be allocated                             

to each bidder, 10% to the Loyalty Pool and the remaining refunded to                         

the purchaser. 

● If there are no bids, 10% will be allocated to the Loyalty Pool, and the                             

remaining will be refunded to the purchaser.  

4.3 Incentivizing the Purchasers 

Similar to purchasers being able to add rewards to RFQ auctions, manufacturers                       

can tag on a MFG Token quote reward. 

Upon submitting a quote to a purchaser, the manufacturer can include a reward                         

in an amount of MFG tokens on top of their quote (the “MFG quote reward”).  

The MFG quote reward can be viewed as a discount, which is then awarded to                             

the purchaser if the offering manufacturer is selected as the winner. Usually                       

quotes are good for 30 days, and giving purchasers MFG tokens could increase                         

their rate of re-order. 

This will allow manufacturers to allocate the MFG token they’ve been awarded                       

through the bidding process back into the ecosystem through the purchasers.  

The amount will depend on the manufacturers as they can allot the same                         

amount as the amount of MFG as stipulated to the winning bidder. The                         

 

25/64 



 

manufacturer can also allocate a larger amount of MFG to further incentivize the                         

purchaser to select their quote as the winning bid. This incentive model will also                           

help to resolve rare occurrences where purchasers will receive bids of exact                       

amount from multiple manufacturers - a bid with a reward will make it more                           

favorable. Additional benefits to purchasers, include: 

● Purchasers with time-sensitive projects can expect faster and more quotes                   

from manufacturers if they add MGF token bid rewards. 

● Purchasers drive competition among manufacturers who offer reduced lead                 

time, competitive prices and faster quotes.  

● Purchasers who make commitments and order faster give and get MFG                     

token incentives from manufacturers. 

● Purchasers can use token rewards and values re-circulated into the                   

ecosystem for various incentives such as placing quicker re-orders or                   

rewarding future purchases. 

 

4.4 Workflow and Distribution for Manufacturers 

1. Manufacturer designates “X” amount of MFG as a quote reward on top of                         

their bid. 

2. Purchaser accepts the offer and is rewarded 80% of MFG allocated as                       

the reward. 

3. The remaining 20% will be reallocated into the community pool.  

 

4.5 Transaction Fee 

A transaction fee will be added to the final purchase orders amount transacted                         

within the ecosystem. The transaction fee is paid for by the purchasers on top of                             

the quoted price. Said value is to be determined during development. The fee                         

will be distributed between SyncFab, Smart MFG Tech LTD and the Loyalty Pool.  

 

26/64 



 

4.6 More Potential Uses for MFG Tokens (Future Builds) 

MFG Token development is dependent and prioritized based on SyncFab’s user                     

feedback, engagement within the platform, feedback from Smart MFG Tech and                     

partner network adopters. The SyncFab team sees unlimited potential in the                     

MFG Tokens for future builds on SyncFab and partner supply chain partner                       

networks. A few applications may include: 

● With some customer education and outreach, the MFG token’s                 

instantaneous and secure financial transactions would replace traditional               

forms of payment through bank wires, ACH and paper checks. 

● MGF tokens may be used as payment for contractors, such as designers,                       

engineers, and quality control consultants. These service professionals               

could be integrated into SyncFab’s ecosystem alternatively into partner                 

supply chain blockchain networks. Design service professionals can give                 

feedback to purchasers’ engineering designs and audit machine               

compatibility to production requirements.  

● SyncFab or partners could be paid in MGF tokens for concierge delivery                       

services and/or consultations to manufacturers on how to network their                   

machines and more closely integrate with SyncFab’s network and the                   

supply chain blockchain. 

4.7 MFG Economic Model  

The Smart Manufacturing Blockchain has a fixed amount of one billion                     

(1,000,000,000) MFG tokens. The tokens will be generated prior and will be                       

distributed during the token distribution event. (Please refer to Section 7.0 for                       

additional information regarding the token distribution event.) No additional                 

MFG tokens will be created after the token distribution event.   

4.8 Loyalty Pool (Transaction Turnover) 

The Transaction Turnover and Loyalty Pool is used to promote and encourage                       

continued engagement within the supply chain ecosystem by rewarding users                   

 

27/64 



 

with MFG tokens. Examples of such engagement are: regular logins to SyncFab                       

and partner networks, creating and updating Smart Contracts, placing orders,                   

auction listing, and bidding on projects. 

 

Figure 5: MFG Token Workflow   

 

28/64 



 

 

5.0 Technical Overview 

5.1 SyncFab Platform Web 2.0  

Current features within the SyncFab Web 2.0 platform connect purchasers to a                       

network of vetted manufacturers for a streamlined procurement process. Users                   

on the site can: 

● Scan through an expanding database of vetted machine shops, mapped by                     

locality 

● Search each company’s machine capabilities  

● Find Profiles, certifications and production ratings of parts manufacturers 

● Process Request-for-quotation (RFQs) ordering & management 

● Upload and share design files  

● Enter Quality Inspection reports 

● Review Order and Re-Order histories 

● Communication between buyers and suppliers facilitated by SyncFab 

● Make payments to 3​rd​-parties via Stripe integration 

● Make direct ACH and wire transfer with banks for lower transaction costs 

● Order product shipment with delivery tracking 

 

29/64 



 

 

Figure 6: Searching for local machine capabilities 

Figure 7: RFQ Management Within SyncFab 

5.2 Example of Parts Procurement Workflow Using SyncFab 2.0 

A procurement process on SyncFab Web 2.0 platform saves significant time                     

compared to traditional procurement processes within the supply chain as it                     

currently functions. 

 

30/64 



 

1. Purchaser searches the SyncFab database of vetted manufacturers. 

2. Purchaser creates RFQ and sends to SyncFab for RFQ quality control. 

3. SyncFab sends out approved RFQ to manufacturers.  

4. Manufacturers review RFQ, decide to send quote. 

5. SyncFab receives quotes, reviews bids for tolerance amounts, applies                 

markup on top of quote and sends bids received to Purchaser.  

6. Purchaser reviews and accepts winning quote, which sets an automatic                   

notification to the selected manufacturer that they’ve won the bid. 

7. SyncFab creates an electronic agreement between the parties. 

8. New Purchasers make 1st payment or deposit amount to SyncFab. 

9. SyncFab issues said deposit to the manufacturer. 

10. Purchaser tracks production on SyncFab’s web and mobile app. 

11. Part is completed and delivered to the purchaser with tracking code. 

12. Purchaser makes final or complete payment to SyncFab. 

13. SyncFab issues final payment to manufacturer. 

 

 

31/64 



 

 

Figure 8: Procurement process workflow in the current SyncFab platform 

 

5.3 SyncFab Platform Web 3.0 and the DApp (Decentralized                 
Application): Smart Contracts and Smart Manufacturing Blockchain             
(Planned Build-Out) 

Planned improvements to the SyncFab Platform will integrate SyncFab’s                 

Decentralized Application DApp, which will expand the blockchain.  

As SyncFab builds back-end architecture to store different types of smart                     

contracts and create tools that allow easy access to them, integrated data set to                           

automation will further improve efficiencies in the supply chain.   

 

32/64 



 

As community members populate smart contracts, architectural concepts can                 

change during development because of customer use cases and other changes                     

within the industry.  

To start, the SyncFab DApp will collect data and create three types of smart                           

contracts: 

5.3.1 Identity Contract 

● Stores records of user identification within the system, i.e. username, email,                     

wallet, ratings, historical order volume, etc. 

● Takes MFG tokens to create and update.  

5.3.2 Purchase Order Contract 

● Serves as an account record for type of work sought/provided: 

● Documents scope of work: Request for Quotation (RFQ), bidder and quote                     

amount, production criteria, designs files or any other shareable IP, and                     

inspection reports. 

● Records all agreement documentation: contracts and payment terms. 

● Takes MFG tokens to initiate an update on the Smart Manufacturing                     

Blockchain. 

5.3.3 Payment Contract 

● Initiates and confirms payments 

● Allows Purchaser to stipulate payment terms  

● Takes MFG tokens to initiate an update on the Smart Manufacturing                     

Blockchain 

After the initial integration of the three Smart Contracts, SyncFab anticipates                     

adding more types of smart contracts which foster the ecosystem’s exchange                     

and efficiency as part of an adequately funded future buildout: 

5.3.4 Account Contracts 

● Stores company information that is accessible by multiple users 

 

33/64 



 

● Contains company wallet, ratings, machine capabilities 

5.3.5 Insurance Contract 

● Outlines coverage for defective products insured by the Smart                 

Manufacturing Blockchain 

5.3.6 Production Contract  

● Stores data inputted and outputted by users 

● Drives private and public data feeds, such as material cost price fluctuations 

● Updates parts production status via smart machines 

 

 

Figure 8: SyncFab Smart Contract Architecture  

5.4 ​Example of Smart Contracts Procurement Transaction             

Workflow 

Using the Smart Contracts, the back and forth of a parts procurement process                         

between the purchaser and manufacturer is streamlined: 

 

34/64 



 

1. Purchaser creates RFQ on the SyncFab platform. 

2. Purchaser submits RFQ to SyncFab for quality assurance services. 

3. SyncFab rep reviews or suggests edits to the RFQ. 

4. RFQ is approved by SyncFab. 

5. The DApp then generates a Purchase Order Contract. 

6. RFQ and agreement documents are sent to the manufacturer(s) via the                     

DApp. 

7. Manufacturer(s) review the RFQ and agreement terms. 

8. Manufacturer(s) quote, and agree to the terms, then submits to quote the                       

DApp. 

9. SyncFab reviews bids for tolerance amounts, applies markup on top of                     

quote and sends 3 bids to purchaser. 

10. Purchaser reviews bids and approves the quote on the DApp. 

11. The manufacturer is automatically notified to produce the product. 

12. When part is completed, manufacturer completes an inspection report. 

13. Inspection report is sent to the purchaser on the SyncFab platform. 

14. The purchaser reviews the inspection report on the SyncFab platform. 

15. SyncFab generates a Payment Contract. 

16. Purchaser selects shipment option via a third-party API on the SyncFab                     

platform. (ex. FedEx). All shipments require a signature upon receiving. 

17. A shipment tracking code is generated by the third-party API. 

18. The purchaser makes the payment to the manufacturer on SyncFab via a                       

third-party, such as Stripe. 

 

35/64 



 

19. The logistic partner picks up product and delivers to purchaser. 

20. The purchaser receives the package and signs off. 

21. The logistic partner updates the status to “Delivered”, which is reflected in                       

the SyncFab platform under the shipment tracking dashboard. 

22. The Purchase Order Contract is then marked as “Completed” and recorded                     

to the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain. 

5.5 ​More Streamlining of Procurement and Transaction within               

SyncFab Features  

With adequate funding, SyncFab plans more advanced features of Smart                   

Contracts to record and validate procurement transactions in the Smart                   

Manufacturing Blockchain, such processes would trim delays in payment.  

 

Figure 9: Streamline Procurement transaction with blockchain 

 

36/64 



 

5.6 Example of Decentralized Procurement Transaction Workflow 

A high-level overview of a parts production workflow within a decentralized                     

system highlights the efficiencies of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain: 

1. Purchaser creates an Identity Contract, which holds contact information,                 

wallet, past order history, and purchaser ratings. 

2. Manufacturer creates an Account Contract containing contact information,               

wallet, manufacturer rating and current machine capabilities that can be                   

regularly updated with usage of MFG token. 

3. Purchaser creates a Purchase Order Contract on the ledger, which contains                     

the RFQ, manufacturer requirements, and all associated agreement               

documents. 

4. The ledger filters manufacturer matching machine capabilities to RFQ and                   

best location fit. 

5. Matching manufacturers receive the RFQ to bid on the project. 

6. The bid and associated agreement documents are sent to the purchaser                     

for approval.  

7. Upon approval, and agreement of terms, the Purchase Order Contract is                     

updated to “In Production.” 

8. The Purchase Order Contract is used to update production status and store                       

machine data. 

9. Upon completion of the production, the manufacturer issues an inspection                   

report to the purchaser. 

10. Upon purchaser’s approval, a Payment Contract is created between the                   

purchaser and manufacturer. 

11. Manufacturer reviews the Payment Contract. 

 

37/64 



 

12. Upon approval of the Payment Contract from the manufacturer, a Purchase                     

Order Contract is created between the purchaser and logistic company for                     

product shipment.  

13. Upon the completion of this contract, the original Purchase Order updates                     

its status to “Completed” and is recorded to the ledger. All previous                       

processes continue at Step 3. 

14. Upon arrival of the product, the Purchase Order Contract with the logistic                       

company updates its status to “Completed” and updates to the ledger. 

15. Upon complete payment from the purchaser to the manufacturer, the                   

original Purchase Order Contract updates its status to “Completed” and is                     

recorded to the ledger. 

5.7 Premium Features Planned for Future SyncFab DApp (Future                 
Build-Outs) 

As the ecosystem of manufacturing stakeholders adopt SyncFab’s services,                 

purchasers and manufacturers can easily manage their end-to-end supply chain                   

production. SyncFab’s forward-looking approach would include premium             

features, such as: 

5.7.1 Application Program Interface (API) 

In creating a public API where companies, vendors and other blockchains can                       

interact and transact on the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain, the supply chain                     

can share and industry-wide standard platform. 

5.7.2 Machine Data Feed  

Direct and live data feeds from smart (or smart-adapted) machines to the Smart                         

Manufacturing Blockchain will allow purchasers and manufacturers to track their                   

parts production in real-time, directly from machine status updates. Inclusive                   

add-on, inserted hardware would attach to factory equipment and the internet                     

 

38/64 



 

so that smart machines communicate directly with the Smart Manufacturing                   

Blockchain in real time.  

5.7.3 Public Data Feed  

Real-time feed from public databases will provide insights into real-time                   

commodity cost, private and public machine capabilities, news RSS by keyword                     

and other related data. Manufacturers can, in turn, use data to better price their                           

quotes based on real-time material costs. Purchasers will have a broader                     

comparative view into machine capabilities outside of the Smart Manufacturing                   

Blockchain. 

5.7.4 Connection to Logistics Providers  

When the ecosystem expands, Smart Manufacturing Blockchain, can track                 

real-time delivery throughout the supply chain to manage their entire                   

production from concept to delivery.   

 

39/64 



 

 

6.0 Competitive Analysis 

Blockchain and expansion of IIoT has been a growing area for investment for many                           

private companies, focused on pinpointing and correcting company inefficiencies.                 

These investments have been largely made by conglomerates hoping to capitalize on                       

global demand for manufactured products.  

 

There are limited, direct comparisons to Smart MFG Tech’s and SyncFab’s                     

industry-specific MFG Token incentive system to facilitate blockchain engagement and                   

build-out on the shopfloor or in the factories. As the blockchain flourishes, large                         

manufacturers or supply chain companies looking for blockchain solutions will adopt                     

the MFG on their networks or simply use SyncFab’s smart manufacturing smart contract                         

protocol and/or production capacity network. 

Within the competitive landscape, companies are approaching decentralized               

manufacturing in different ways:  

● General Electric: Focused on finding inefficiencies within its own systems, GE’s                     

migration towards smart factories is mostly self-contained and aimed at improving                     

the company’s performance within its massive enterprise and vast product lines.                     

Large conglomerates like GE can afford to invest millions of dollars on                       

company-specific smart technologies. 

● IBM: Hyperledger is designed for business-to-business exchanges, and functions as                   

a private enterprise blockchain for companies who may already do business                     

together and trust each other enough to share documents, designs and contracts.                       

Aimed at creating efficiencies among partners, this system would serve prominent                     

manufacturers who may already dominate the supply chain in various ways. 

● Google: Google search engines place priorities on paid advertisers. In a given                       

search, topping their lists are supply chain players who pay to get business to their                             

door. Yet many precision parts machine shops remain unknown. The effort it takes                         

 

40/64 



 

for purchasers to investigate and learn more about a company’ capabilities and                       

capacities can’t be easily accessed on public search engines. Such clearinghouses                     

for small- to medium-sized shops do not exist yet. 

● SyncFab serves as the first, public peer-to-peer manufacturing ecosystem. A                   

decentralized manufacturing platform where token holders can interact directly                 

with each other to launch projects and procure parts, pay for services, and get                           

them delivered creates trust among community users. In the future, SyncFab                     

would authenticate off-chain data sets on-chain using Cornell’s IC3 developed                   

Town Crier System. SyncFab plans to explore the public to private blockchain smart                         

contract data synthesis using Cornell's Town Crier project when SyncFab proceeds                     

to build out its live machine data feed in the scenario the funding hard cap is                               

achieved. 

 

 

   

 

41/64 



 

 

7.0 Roadmap 

Conceptual development planning for the MFG Token, the Smart Manufacturing Smart                     

Contract and SyncFab Platform Web 3.0 began in August 2017 with a goal of completing                             

token integration soon after the end of MFG Token Distribution Event and completion                         

of a smart contract adapted 3.0 platform by 2019. SyncFab is committed to the                           

long-term success of the platform and the standardization of the Smart Manufacturing                       

Blockchain. Listening and adjusting to customer feedback is ingrained in SyncFab’s                     

approach and essential to building a product of high value that will save time or reduce                               

overhead for clients. 

If the ETH minimum crowdsale target is met the MFG Token launch will involve:  

● Creation of the smart contracts to generate and distribute the 1,000,000,000                     

supply of MFG to the allotment stipulated in the Token Distribution Plan. 

● Creation of five (5) wallets. Each will store its individually distributed MFG amounts                         

in the allotment. An encrypted digital wallet stores its encoded MFG or ETH, and                           

can be decoded to validate its actual amount on the Ethereum Network. 

● Creation of a crowdsale smart contract to distribute the MFG tokens in the amount                           

relative to the ETH contributed from the Token Distribution Sale. 

● Creation of the Ethereum Virtual Machine (EVM) to secure, execute and validate                       

the previously mentioned smart contracts, future smart contracts, and the transfer                     

and conversion of MFG to ETH, and vice versa on the Ethereum Network.   

● Integration of the EVM into the current SyncFab 2.0 platform and technology stack. 

7.1 Milestones 

*The roadmap is subject to changes during development and regulations affecting                     

blockchain technology and utility token economics. Dependent on the soft cap raised                       

during the initial token issuance to early adopters and any regulatory changes to the                           

utility token economies, the roadmap is subject to re-prioritization due to unforeseen                       

 

42/64 



circumstances or complications during development stages or through customer                 

feedback of real life use cases.  

Milestone 1​ - Q1 2018 

Milestone 2​ - Q2 2018 

Milestone 3​ - Q3 2018 

Milestone 4​ - Q4 2018 

Milestone 5​ - Q1 2019 

Milestone 6​ - Q2 2019 

MFG Token Generation Event and Distribution 

February 15 - Token Generation and March 30 - April 15 MFG  
Token Distribution. (If 500 ETH/500K USD Minimum is met) 

MFG Token Acceptance Integration 

Integration  of  the  MFG  token  for  acceptance  into  existing  
SyncFab RFQ Web 2.0 Sourcing (Pre-Blockchain) platform. 

Ongoing  Exploratory  discussions  with  partner  manufacturing  
supply  chain  networks  for  MFG  token  acceptance  and 
integration for dedicated and inter-industry protocol blockchains 
and smart contracts.  

Format  Ethereum  Blockchain  Smart  Contracts 

for Purchasers  

Amend  Ethereum  Smart  Contract  conditions  for  Supply  Chain  
Purchaser Requirements (If 15K ETH/15M USD Soft Cap is met) 

Format  Ethereum  Blockchain  Smart  Contracts  
for Suppliers 

Amend  Ethereum  Smart  Contract  conditions  ​for  existing  
Machine Shop Capabilities 

Implement  MFG  Ethereum  Supply  Chain  
Blockchain Smart Contract 

Implement  Purchaser-Supplier  MFG  tailored  Ethereum  Smart  
Contract on SyncFab Platform 

Survey Machine Shop Upgrade Requirements   
Survey  machine  shop  upgrades  to  meet  more  Supply  Chain  

Purchaser  automated  requirements  on  end-to-end  Blockchain 

Smart Contract (If 33K ETH/30M USD Hard Cap is reached) 

43/64 



Milestone 7​ - Q3 2019  Formulate Upgrade Solution for Machine Shops   
Based on wholistic survey results formulate economical             

hardware networking solution to instantaneously grab and put               

online data feeds from the production machines for data driven                   

process optimization and real time monitoring 

Milestone 8​ - Q4 2019  Begin Implementing Machine Live Data Feed           

Upgrade Solution   

To include Off-chain & Onchain data authentication mechanism               

integration 

7.2 Funding Roadmap 

Funding to Milestone Targets 

Funding 
Target:  Soft Cap: 15K ETH 

(15M USD)   
Hard Cap: 33K ETH 
(30M USD) 

Deliverables: Layer Blockchain 
Smart Contracts 
to 2.0  

Supplier Holistic 
Integration Survey 

Format Purchaser 
Smart Contracts 

Machine Live Data 
Feed Solution 

Format Supplier 
Smart Contracts 

Upgrade Adapted 
Blockchain 3.0 

Minimum: 
500 ETH (500K 
USD) 

MFG Token  
Generation 

MFG Token  
Distribution 

MFG Token  
SyncFab 2.0  
Integration 

MFG Token  
Industry 
Partnership 
Outreach 

MFG Token Industry 
4.0 Strategic 
Partnership 
Outreach 

44/64 



8.0 MFG Token Distribution Launch 

Smart MFG Tech’s MFG Token Distribution Event in partnership with SyncFab provides                       

opportunities for those who want to see manufacturing revolutionized by a public,                       

peer-to-peer ecosystem and blockchain. The MFG Tokens will incentivize innovators                   

and manufacturers to connect and create.  

8.1 Token Distribution Event 

1. Token Name: Smart Manufacturing Token

2. Token Symbol: MFG

3. Total Supply: 1,000,000,000 MFG

4. Allocated market (public) supply: 300,000,000 MFG (30%)

5. Pre-Sale Start Date: November 15, 2017

6. Pre-Sale  will  conclude  when  allocation  is  deemed  exhausted  or  on 

February 15, 2018.

7. Main Public Sale Date: February 15, 2018

8. We will be accepting ether (ETH) as the form of payment.

9. 1 ETH = 5,000 MFG

10. Minimum Goal: 500 ETH (500K USD) ~ This is our minimum goal. If the 

amount  is  not  reached,  we  will  refund  all  ETH  contributed  in  

the crowdsale.

11. Soft Cap: 15K ETH (15M USD) 

45/64 



 

12. Hard Cap: 33K ETH (30M USD) This is the maximum amount in MFG                         

Tokens we’re looking to sell in the crowdsale. 

13. Any unsold MFG allocated to the public market supply will be destroyed                       

after the distribution event.  

8.2 Bonus Incentives 

8.2.1 Industrial Revolutionary Private Presale  

This presale is exclusive to long-term or strategic partners in the industrial                       

manufacturing space which have expressed interest in participating and                 

supporting the expansion of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain. 

● Start Date: November 15, 2017 

8.2.2 Hardware Innovators Exclusive Presale 

For innovative manufacturing and supply chain professionals and apprentices. 

● Bonus: +50% MFG Tokens 

● No Minimum 

● Start Date: November 15, 2017 

8.2.3 Public Presale 

For the aspiring early adopter supply chain purchasers and hardware                   

manufacturers. 

● Bonus: +25% MFG Tokens 

● No Minimum 

● Start Date: January 1, 2018 

8.2.4 Main Public Sale 

For the aspiring hardware innovators, supply chain and manufacturing                 

professionals. 

● No Minimum 
 

46/64 



 

● February 15 — February 21, 2018 (9:00 AM PST): ​15% Bonus 

● February 21 — February 28, 2018 (9:00 AM PST): ​10% Bonus 

● February 28 — March 11, 2018 (9:00 AM PST): ​5% Bonus 

● March 11 — March 15, 2018 (9:00 AM PST): ​2.5% Bonus 

Any unsold MFG will be destroyed after the distribution event. 

8.3 Token Distribution Plan 

1. Prior to the token distribution event, Smart MFG Tech LTD will generate a supply                           

of one billion (1,000,000,000) MFG tokens. 

2. A total of three hundred million (300,000,000) MFG will be offered to the public                           

(current SyncFab users and the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain early adopters). 

3. Each MFG wallet account will store MFG tokens on the blockchain to the unit of                             

18 decimal places - the smallest unit of an MFG token being                       

0.000000000000000001 MFG. 

4. The distribution Smart Contract does not permit any new tokens to be created                         

or destroyed after the token distribution event. At the conclusion of the                       

distribution event, the token distribution Smart Contract will destroy any MFG                     

publically-allocated tokens which are not sold at the close of the event. 

5. There will be no inflating of the MFG. 

6. The total supply of MFG is dependent on how many MFG’s are sold during the                             

distribution event; the final supply has yet to be determined. 

 

 

47/64 



 

 

Figure 10: MFG Token distribution chart 

 

1. 30% to Token Sale offered to the public (current and new SyncFab users                         

and early adopters of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain) 

2. 30% to Strategic Partnership Adoption Pool for long-term community                 

building and adoption of the Smart Manufacturing Smart Contract                 

Blockchain Protocol through partner manufacturing supply chain networks               

and other partnerships based on MFG token acceptance. The MFG within                     

this pool will be allocated to potential Smart Manufacturing Blockchain                   

partners who will adopt and implement the usage of said blockchain to                       

their network of users 

3. 15% to SyncFab for research, engineering, deployment, business               

development, and marketing with standard 2 year lock-up. 

4. 10% to Founding Team and Bounty—Team, Advisors and Early Contributors  

 

48/64 



 

5. 15% to Smart MFG Tech LTD​ for long-term ecosystem promotional budget,                     

and network governance.  

8.4 Strategic Partnership Adoption Pool 

The Strategic Partnership Adoption Pool with a pre-allocated amount of three                     

hundred million (300,000,000) MFG tokens is created to support continued                   

community growth and Smart Manufacturing Blockchain adoption. The MFG                 

tokens will be distributed to potential partners who commit to implementing the                       

Smart Manufacturing Blockchain into their current systems.  

The MFG tokens will also be distributed by the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain                       

partners to their current user base to promote adoption and engagement                     

within their own networks. For example, to ease the barrier of entry of adopting                           

a new ordering system, the partner can allocate their current users with 1,000                         

MFG tokens to start using within the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain to procure                       

parts production. New members to the ecosystem are given incentives to use                       

allocated amounts to cover time and resources needed to learn about and                       

promote the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain.  

 

8.5 Funding Breakdown 

Smart MFG Tech LTD’s expected use of proceeds is dependent on the soft-cap                         

of Ethereum (ETH) raised during our token distribution event.   

 

49/64 



 

 

Figure 11: Smart MFG Tech LTD Expected Use of Proceeds   

1. 50% Software Development – Smart Manufacturing Blockchain and Smart                 

Contract 

2. 15% Marketing and Business Development - Marketing efforts include                 

expanding awareness and adoption of the platform while enhancing                 

engagement with current users. These funds will be directed at third-party                     

providers offering marketing, PR, partnerships, and affiliates 

3. 15% Administration and Operational Expenses - Consists of security,                 

accounting and other associated administration costs 

4. 5% Legal & Compliance - Legal efforts include incorporation, regulation,                   

compliance and ongoing operation 

5. 5% Reserved - This is a set aside for unforeseen costs 

6. 10% Smart MFG Tech LTD - Allocated to Smart MFG Tech LTD budget to                           

foster stability and demand for the MFG Token 

 

50/64 



 

8.6 MFG Token Distribution Smart Contract 

View our Github repository for latest code updates: ​https://github.com/syncfab 

8.7 Reference: Ethereum Smart Contract Standard 

View Ethereum Smart Contract Standards at: ​https://www.ethereum.org/greeter 

 

   

 

51/64 

https://github.com/syncfab
https://www.ethereum.org/greeter


 

 

9.0 Risk Factors 

There are many challenges that can potentially serve as a barrier of entry for mass                             

adoption of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain in the manufacturing industry,                   

including widespread acceptance of the proposed economic model. Some initial risk                     

factors may include: 

● Reluctance by suppliers to adopt new technology. SyncFab would have to provide                       

effective training to use the platform 

● Brokers resist change and hold on to customers. 

● Supply capacity bottlenecks and price surges. 

● Manufacturers want to remain siloed and isolated. SyncFab would create ways for                       

them to adapt to its reporting systems and communications channels. 

● Local ecosystems and laws could be slow to adapt. 

Additional risk factors apply to SyncFab’s business in general and the MFG Token Sale                           

event in particular, and of widespread adoption of the Smart Manufacturing                     

Blockchain:  

● SyncFab may not reach the minimum, soft cap or hard cap target sale amounts                           

and may not have the sufficient funds to execute on its business plan. 

● The MFG token may be significantly influenced by digital currency market trends                       

and MFG value may be severely depreciated due to non-MFG related events in the                           

digital currency markets. 

● Areas of the manufacturing supply chain industry may fall under global or local                         

regulation that may limit the use of tokens for supply chain procurement. 

● SyncFab Web 3.0 is a complex software platform, and its launch may be                         

significantly delayed due to unforeseen development barriers. 

● Competition may introduce same or better manufacturing supply chain smart                   

contract solutions and cause SyncFab to lose market share and eventually fail to                         

deliver on its business goals. 

● The use of MFG tokens may come under the scrutiny of governmental institutions. 

 

52/64 



 

● The ownership of MFG tokens may fall under new and unpredicted taxation laws                         

that will erode MFG benefits. 

● Smart MFG Tech LTD may not succeed in creating the necessary momentum and                         

acceptance for the MFG token, which may result in low liquidity and depletion of                         

trades. 

● The positions and plans outlined in this white paper may be altered as the project                             

progresses. 

 

   

 

53/64 



 

 

10.0 Team 

10.1 Smart MFG Tech LTD 

Smart MFG Tech LTD promotes new technologies and applications for use                     

within the Industrial Manufacturing industry. A dominating, but not exclusive                   

focus is the promotion of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain, the MFG Token                       

and its related technologies, as well as its promotion of technologies and                       

applications supporting said blockchain. Smart MFG Tech will generate,                 

distribute and manage the MFG Token and will work to add partners such as                           

private and public companies, along with government entities to adopt and                     

standardize the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain as a system of records for all                       

manufacturing procurement within the industrial supply chain. For new strategic                   

partnerships, Smart MFG Tech LTD will manage the network governance and                     

overall health of the MFG token ecosystem as well as allocate from the partner                           

adoption pool of MFG tokens, to be given to new users to source and procure                             

parts production through the usage of the Smart Manufacturing Blockchain.  

Hikaru Yuki - Executive Director 

Hikaru is an International Supply Chain Professional with               

almost a decade of experience at Fuji Xerox Global Supply                   

Chain Department. 

View Linkedin Profile 

Jason Tong - General Manager  

Jason is an International business professional with             

extensive experience in Blockchain, Cryptocurrencies,         

eCommerce and Internet Technologies. 

View Linkedin Profile  

 

54/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/hikaru-yuki-1a94b8117/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/jasonleetong/


 

10.2 SyncFab Team 

Jeremy Goodwin - Chief Executive Officer 

Jeremy is CEO of SyncFab, an IIoT Industry 4.0 Blockchain                   

Manufacturing Industry Partner to the $140MM US D.O.E. &                 

D.O.C. Clean Energy Smart Manufacturing Innovation           

Initiative (CESMII) appointed by the White House and US                 

Departments of Energy and Commerce National Network for               

Manufacturing Innovation (NNMI). SyncFab is also the San Francisco Mayor's                   

Office of Civic Innovation - 2016 Startup in Residence (STIR) in partnership with                         

the Cities of San Leandro, Oakland and West Sacramento.  

From 2008 - 2012, Jeremy served as Executive President and CFO of China                         

Advanced Construction Materials Company, leading it to peak performance of                   

2,000 employees and NASDAQ IPO. As the only bilingual member of the                       

company board of directors, he was responsible for negotiating large                   

international contracts, implementing SOX 404 compliance, and managing               

international accounting audits, SEC and shareholder communications. Jeremy               

secured a $100M Private Equity investment offer in support of company                     

expansion plans and NASDAQ listing before board decision to privatize.   

From 2002 - 2008, Jeremy was Managing Director of 3G Capital Partners and                         

Global Capital Group - Trans-Pacific merchant banking firms with more than                     

$250M in transaction mandates.  

From 1996 - 2002, Jeremy worked as a financial executive at ING Barings, Baring                           

Capital Partners, ABN Amro, Mees Pierson in New York, London, Amsterdam,                     

Geneva, Beijing, and Hong Kong including Carlyle Partners first $1BN Fund. 

Jeremy is fluent in Chinese and French and as a social impact entrepreneur, is                           

passionate about technologies improving the human condition.  

View Linkedin Profile 

 

 

55/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/jeremygoodwin/


 

Andy Tong - Chief Strategy Officer 

Andy Tong is a entrepreneur well known for his success in the                       

video game industry as CEO and Founder of top online game                     

portal MMOABC, which at its peak garnered millions of                 

monthly MMO gaming visitors from North America with zero                 

spent on advertising before the proliferation of social media.                 

Andy’s current role as Chief Strategy Officer involves influencing, maintaining,                   

and fostering relationships with strategic partnerships, investors, and               

customers. In addition, he achieved great success in the eCommerce referral                     

industry by securing thousands of advertiser partnerships through his portfolio                   

of web portals that leveraged state of the art search engine marketing and                         

deployed browser based advertising technologies with online retail sales totaling                   

over $50 million USD in the last decade. Andy also serves as President of IVP                             

Investment Group an angel investor in startups and serves on the advisory                       

board for Senhoa. He earned his bachelor's degree in business administration                     

(CIS) from the California State Polytechnic University in Pomona, California. For                     

over 18 years he has been an avid practitioner of health and fitness. Andy is a                               

supporter of the 2nd amendment and currently resides in Frisco, Texas, with his                         

daughter, wife and pet dog. 

View Linkedin Profile 

Jay Ligda - Chief Technology Officer 

Jay is currently the Chief Technology Officer of SyncFab. Jay’s                   

responsibilities involves managing a team of developers to               

maintain, and develop the SyncFab application. Jay is a                 

self-educated technologist who’s been in the development             

community for the last 20 years. He owned and managed                   

Synergetic Web Creations Website, which provided consultation for small to                   

medium businesses developing solutions in HTML, CSS, JS, CGI Script                   

Integration, ASP, SQL Server, PHP, AJAX and MySQL.  

View Linkedin Profile  

 

56/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/andyletong/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/jligda/


 

Dennis Delgado - Chief Design Officer 

Dennis Delgado has over 10 years in the art and design world.                       

He has played many roles from gallery director to UI/UX                   

designer. He has curated numerous Art & Design shows with                   

artists whose works are in the collections of SFMoMA, MoMa,                   

Mint Museum, Pompidou, and The Art Institute of Chicago.                 

More recently, he co-founded SyncFab.com, an online platform matching                 

businesses to local manufacturers to help bring ease and accessibility to the                       

product design & production process. Currently, Dennis resides in San Leandro,                     

CA, working with the city to create the first ever Smart Manufacturing grid. 

View Linkedin Profile 

Victor Nguyen - VP Product & Operations 

Victor Nguyen is a driven self-starter and professional with a                   

vast skillset and experiences in the startup, public, and private                   

sector, both nationally and internationally. His entrepreneurial             

mindset and expertise are driven by an obsession to “do what                     

it takes” to be successful and streamlining processes to be as                     

efficient as possible. 

Victor graduated with a degree in Civil Engineering and spent eight years                       

designing highways and pipelines while working for the City of Arcadia and                       

Psomas, a private company. His entrepreneur nature then took him into a                       

different direction, away from Civil Engineering and into events, marketing and                     

development. Relocated in Vietnam, he created and operated two companies: I                     

AM Group, an events and marketing company, and Adventuity, a development                     

consultant company. Victor is now back in the United States and a part of the                             

SyncFab team after a two-year tenure at a SaaS startup, SalesHood, where he                         

was responsible for customer success, product management, and operations.  

View Linkedin Profile 

Ben Gerstein - VP Marketing 

 

57/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/dennis-delgado-888b1913/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/victorquocnguyen/


 

Ben Gerstein has over 12 years’ experience in digital marketing, during which                       

he’s advised fast growing venture-funded SaaS startups and Fortune 50 global                     

consumer product companies in their digital marketing strategy. Ben has helped                     

companies accelerate growth and optimize the customer journey through SEM,                   

PPC, SEO, display / retargeting campaigns, email marketing, social media ads,                     

content marketing, conversion rate optimization, account based marketing and                 

growth hacking. 

View Linkedin Profile  

Sharon Wang - UX Designer  

Sharon Wang is a UX/UI and graphic designer based in the                     

Bay Area but originally from Los Angeles. She has a passion                     

for human-centered design as a way to help others. 

View Linkedin Profile  

Ali Zain - Blockchain Developer 

Ali Zain has over a decade of experience in Full-Stack                   

application development. He is an expert in blockchain,               

cryptocurrency & ICO development. He also co-founded             

Ideofuzion. 

View Linkedin Profile  

Yasir Iqbal​ - Blockchain Developer 
Yasir Iqbal is a veteran in blockchain, cryptocurrency and                 

software development. He has extensive experience in             

mobile application development and has lectured           

university students in Java, C++, data structures and               

databases. Yasir has a master's degree in computer science and also                     

co-founded Ideofuzion. 

View Linkedin Profile  

 

58/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/bengerstein
https://www.linkedin.com/in/sharoncwang312
https://www.linkedin.com/in/ali-zain-a31a0932/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/yasiriqbal776/


 

Ali Rizvi - Blockchain Developer 

Ali Rizvi is a software developer with experience in Solidity,                   

Node JS, Angular 2 and MEAN stack. He has a strong                     

passion for world changing disruptive technologies such as               

blockchain and cryptocurrencies. 

View Linkedin Profile  

10.3 Advisory Board  

Mike Jones - Science Inc. , Dollar Shave Club, MySpace 

Mike Jones is an internet executive, investor and strategic                 

advisor and CEO of Science, Inc. He is Los Angeles’s most                     

active angel investor with more than $2.5B in exits. His                   

exits in 2016 alone included Science portfolio companies               

HelloSociety (acquired by New York Times), FameBit             

(acquired by Google) and Dollar Shave Club (acquired by                 

Unilever). He is also a long-time entrepreneur. He started his first company in                         

college, and he was previously the CEO of Userplane (acquired by AOL), Tsavo                         

(acquired by Cybermedia), PBJ (acquired by JB), MySpace (acquired by Specific                     

Media), Myspace Japan (acquired by Softbank), and FIM (acquired by Rubicon                     

Project). 

View Linkedin Profile 

Gil Penchina - Ridge Ventures, Paypal, Ebay 

Gil Penchina is a serial entrepreneur, super angel and                 

Partner at Ridge Ventures. He’s an investor in Brave,                 

Ripple, Filecoin, Civic, EOS and was actually an angel                 

investor in the first cryptocurrency startup, PayPal in 1999.                 

Previously he was the founder of Flight.vc which manages                 

over 25 investment syndicates with over 3,000 angel               

investors, a co-founder of Fastly, CEO of Wikia, now a top 50 website and was a                               

member of the pre-IPO team at eBay. Before eBay, Gil worked at General                         

 

59/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/ali-rizvi-5a884b9a/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/mjones


 

Electric, Bain & Co. and started two small technology companies. In addition, Gil                         

has been an active angel investor in over 300 companies including firms such as                           

Dollar Shave Club, Cruise Automotive, LinkedIn, PayPal, AngelList, AltSchool,                 

eShares, Wealthfront, Indiegogo, and many others. 

View Linkedin Profile   

Jeff Berwick - CEO of The Dollar Vigilante  

Jeff Berwick has been a technology entrepreneur and               

investor since he founded Canada's largest financial             

website, Stockhouse.com, in 1993. The company went on               

to be worth $240 million at the peak of the tech bubble.                       

Mr. Berwick founded The Dollar Vigilante in 2010 and                 

became one of bitcoin's most prominent promoters when               

it was $3 in 2011. He continues to be one of the most watched promoters of                               

cryptocurrencies and blockchain technologies through The Dollar Vigilante.  

View Linkedin Profile 

Simon Cocking - Senior Editor, Irish Tech News  

Simon Cocking is Senior Editor at Irish Tech News, Editor in                     

Chief at CryptoCoinNews, and freelances for Sunday             

Business Post, Irish Times, Southern Star, IBM, G+D, and                 

other publications. He has advised 18 successful ICOs to                 

date and is an accomplished public speaker at events                 

including TEDx, Web Summit, Dublin Tech Summit, and               

overseas in Singapore, Moscow, Tel Aviv, Madrid, Tbilisi, Riga, Porto and Helsinki                       

in the last 12 months.  

View Linkedin Profile 

 

 

 

60/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/gilpenchina
https://www.linkedin.com/in/jeff-berwick-13211335/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/simon-cocking-20540135/


 

Peter Moricz - CEO of Moricz.io  

Peter M. Moricz is an investor, founder, a mentor in startups                     

and a successful advisor to numerous blockchain token               

offerings. Peter brings a wealth of first-hand knowledge and                 

expertise to this ever-evolving industry. His focus is mainly                 

Europe but has a global network of partners who are highly                     

respected in the blockchain community.  

View Linkedin Profile 

Steve Sprague  - CEO of Rivetz Corp.  

Steven Sprague is the CEO of Rivetz Corp. and one of the                       

principle industry evangelists for the application of trusted               

computing technology. Steven has a strong technical             

foundation in the principles, capabilities and business             

models of incorporating trusted hardware into everyday             

computing, and is skilled at translating these concepts into                 

layman’s terms.  

View Linkedin Profile 

Professor Xiaochun Li - UCLA Raytheon Chair of 
Manufacturing, CTO of CA CESMII  

Professor Xiaochun Li is the Raytheon Chair in Manufacturing                 

Engineering at UCLA Department of Mechanical and             

Aerospace Engineering,& Department of Materials Science           

and Engineering. He is also CTO, California Smart               

Manufacturing Center, Clean Energy Smart Manufacturing           

Innovation Institute of which SyncFab is a resource partner.  

View Linkedin Profile 

   

 

61/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/petermmoricz/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/petermmoricz/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/xiaochun-li-991236123/


 

Mark Crone - CLG  LAW 

Mr. Crone is the Managing Partner of Crone Law Group,                   

specializing in the corporate, securities and other regulatory               

aspects of global business ventures across a diverse array of                   

industries between companies in the U.S. with Asia, Central                 

and South America, Russia, Africa, Australia and the Middle East. 

With almost twenty-five years of global legal, corporate and investment banking                     

experience, Mr. Crone represents both U.S. and foreign corporations across a                     

wide range of industries. His broad experience includes public and private                     

equity and debt security financings, international mergers and acquisitions,                 

angel, venture capital and private equity financings, project finance, banking and                     

financial instruments, secured debt transactions, going private transactions,               

foreign direct investment and corporate law and governance. 

View Linkedin Profile 

Michael Wong - MUFG  

Michael Wong is an experienced cyber security expert and                 

leader in the financial services industry, working with teams                 

to balance security and business objectives. As VP at MUFG                   

he led the development of the cybersecurity program for                 

System & Endpoints and was instrumental in the creation of                   

the Cyber Security Operations Center (CSOC). Prior to MUFG,                 

Michael has consulted for Fortune 100 companies while at KPMG and data                       

analytics with the Walt Disney Company. 

View Linkedin Profile  

   

 

62/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/markcronecronekline/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/wongmichael


 

Chris Cheng - Apple  

Chris Cheng is a senior mechanical product designer with                 

expertise in consumer electronics and medical devices. He               

values a detail- oriented and user-centered approach to               

design with an eye for aesthetics. He is comfortable working                   

with senior management and cross-functional teams. He worked in startup                   

garage to Fortune 500 company and was a co-inventor on 6 issued patents.  

View Linkedin Profile   

 

63/64 

https://www.linkedin.com/in/chris-cheng-2771667/


 

 

11.0 Changelog - White Paper Versions & Edits  

1. 09/18/2017 - V1 Public Release 

2. 09/19/2017 - V2 Expanded on Sections 1.2.4, 2.1.3, 6.1, and 6.2  

3. 09/20/2017 - V2 Expanded on Section 3.6, Added Mark Crone to Section 7.3 

4. 09/21/2017 - Added Michael Santore to Section 7.2 

5. 09/29/2017 - Added Mike Jones to Section 7.3 

6. 10/09/2017 - Added Gil Penchina to Section 7.3 

7. 10/11/2017 - Clarification of inherent risks and industry terminology per                   

lawyer’s comments (numerous sections) 

8. 11/02/2017 - Updated token economics, bonus structure in 8.0 and added  

9. 11/7/2017 - Editorial restructuring including roadmap clarification, competitive               

analysis and bonus structure revision 

10. 11/10/2017 - Clarification on Section 8.0 

11. 11/14/2017 - Final Edits before PreSale 

12. 12/13/2017 - Lowered Soft Cap & Hard Cap 

13. 12/14/2017 - Edited Presale Date & Added Steven Sprague Advisor 

14. 1/9/2018 - Edited Section 8, added USD caps with ETH equivalent  

15. 1/20/2018 - Edited Section 8 Hard Cap & Soft Caps 

16. 2/15/2018 - Public Sale Bonuses Added 

 

64/64 


